Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-683
Short-time compensation program; department; funding.

The department shall not use General Funds to implement the short-time compensation program. The department shall use any and all available federal funds to implement the short-time compensation program, including, but not limited to, federal funds distributed to the state under sections 903(c), 903(d), 903(f), and 903(g) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 2.
July 18, 2026